North Dakota statutes. TITLE 11 Counties
CHAPTER 11-36 Port Authorities [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2015, ch. 439, § 104]

11-36-01.
Definitions. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 95, § 1; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

11-36-02.
General powers. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 95, § 1; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

11-36-03.
Creation of municipal port authority. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 95, § 1; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

11-36-04.
Creation of regional port authority. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 95, § 1; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

11-36-05.
Certificate of incorporation of regional port authority. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 95, § 1; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

11-36-06.
Proof of existence of authority. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 95, § 1; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

11-36-07.
Commissioners — Compensation — Meetings — Officers. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 95, § 1; 2013, ch. 93, § 7; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

11-36-08.
Specific powers of a port authority. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 95, § 1; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

11-36-09.
Disposal of port property. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 95, § 1; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

11-36-10.
Bonds and other obligations. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 95, § 1; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

11-36-11.
Operation and use privileges. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 95, § 1; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

11-36-12.
Regulations. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 95, § 1; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

11-36-13.
Federal and state aid. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 95, § 1; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

11-36-14.
Tax levy may be certified by port authority or municipality. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 95, § 1; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

Note.

Section 11-36-14 was amended 2 times and repealed by the 2015 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is treated as repealed.

Section 10 of Chapter 92, Session Laws 2015, Seante Bill 2217; Section 13 of Chapter 88, Session Laws 2015, Senate Bill 2056. and Section 104 of Chapter 439, Senate Bill 2144.

11-36-15.
County tax levy for port purposes. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 95, § 1; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

11-36-16.
Joint operations. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 95, § 1; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

11-36-17.
Public purpose. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 95, § 1; 2007, ch. 293, § 8; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

11-36-18.
Port property and income exempt from taxation. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 95, § 1; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

11-36-19.
Municipal cooperation. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 95, § 1; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

11-36-20.
Out-of-state port jurisdiction authorized — Reciprocity with adjoining states and governmental agencies. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 95, § 1; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

11-36-21.
Supplemental authority. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 95, § 1; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

11-36-22.
Debt service fund. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 95, § 1; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.